Washington statutes.
RCW 35.67.340

Statutes governing combined facility.

The operation by a city or town of a combined facility as provided for in RCW 35.67.331 shall be governed by the statutes relating to the establishment and maintenance of a city or town water system if the water system is one of the systems included in the combined acquisition, construction, or operation; otherwise the combined system shall be governed by the statutes relating to the establishment and maintenance of a city or town sewerage system.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 51 s 2; 1965 c 7 s 35.67.340. Prior: 1941 c 193 s 12, part; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 9354-15, part.]